Tennessee statutes. Title 10 Public Libraries, Archives and Records
Part 1

Preserving and Transcribing Records

10-7-101. “Records” construed.

“Records,” as used in this part, shall be construed to mean any records of the county legislative body and common law, circuit, criminal, or chancery court, the register's books, the surveyor's and entry taker's book, and all other public records, required by law to be kept in the several courts of this state.

Acts 1879, ch. 115, § 2; Shan., § 3793; Code 1932, § 7698; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-101.

Cross-References. Register of county, title 8, ch. 13.

Law Reviews.

Enabling the Gaze: Public Access and the Withdrawal of Tennessee's Proposed Rule of Civil Procedure 1A (Albert Louis Chollet III), 36 U. Mem. L. Rev. 695 (2006).

Remedies other than the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act “Contested Case” Approach to Dealing with State and Local Governmental Action (John Beasley), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 619 (1984).

Attorney General Opinions. Voter secrecy protection, OAG 96-027, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (2/28/96).

Alternative Dispute Resolution Commission records, OAG 96-147, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 176 (12/18/96).

Publication of criminal case dispositions on the internet, OAG 00-014, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 14 (1/26/00).

10-7-102. Books for register's office to be furnished by county.

The county legislative body, on demand of the register, shall procure for the register's office well-bound books for the purpose of registering therein such instruments of writing as are required by law to be registered, the cost of which shall be paid by the trustee of the county, on the warrant of the county mayor, which shall be issued on the register producing before the county mayor the receipt of the person from whom the books were purchased, and making affidavit that the register has paid, or is bound to pay, the sum specified in the receipt.

Code 1858, § 2090 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 62, § 7); Shan., § 3770; Code 1932, § 7681; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-102; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Books for register's office furnished by county, § 8-13-109.

Duties of register, § 8-13-108.

Transfer to new counties, § 5-2-107.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus, § 12.

10-7-103. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 2091 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 62, § 1); Shan., § 3771; Code 1932, § 7682; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-103; repealed by Acts 2018, ch. 525, § 1, effective March 7, 2018.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 10-7-103 concerned records laid before county legislative body annually for examination.

10-7-104. Mutilated records to be transcribed — Incomplete copies.

When any record book or books of the register's office of any county have been damaged or mutilated by fire or otherwise, so that any part of the record in any book is destroyed, or mutilated, or is likely to become destroyed, or mutilated by continual use, the county legislative body of such county shall cause the same to be transcribed by the register, in a fair and legible hand, into a well-bound book or books, to be procured by the county legislative body, all such record books in the order of the dates of the original registration, marking at the top of each copy the original book and page or pages from which the transcript is made, so that no variation may appear between the pages of the transcript and those that were noted in the certificates on the original instruments; and, in all cases where the record of any word, part of word, sentence, part of sentence, or part of instrument, is destroyed, all that remains shall be copied, and the destroyed part indicated with asterisks.

Acts 1877, ch. 83, § 1; Shan., § 3787; Code 1932, § 7683; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-104.

Cross-References. Register's fees for preservation of records, § 8-21-1001.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus § 12.

10-7-105. Rebinding or copying books at expense of county.

It is the duty of all county registers to have the books of their offices copied when, in the judgment of the county legislative body, they are so worn or mutilated as to need rebinding or copying. The county legislative bodies shall make the necessary appropriations to defray the expenses of the same.

Acts 1899, ch. 272, § 1; Shan., § 3787a1; mod. Code 1932, § 7684; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-105.

Cross-References. Copy from original, § 10-7-116.

County legislative bodies authorized to have certain record books rebound, § 10-7-119.

Liability of register and clerks suspended while record books away for rebinding, § 10-7-120.

10-7-106. Transcript books to be collated and certified to by register and deputy register.

The copies made by the register shall be faithfully collated by the register and deputy register, both of whom shall, at the end of each book of transcript, by a joint certificate, certify that they have carefully collated the same with the original record book, and that it contains a full, true, and complete copy or transcript of the record in the original book; and in case any part of the original record is destroyed or mutilated so that the same cannot be ascertained, they shall add to their certificate the words, “so far as the same can be ascertained from its burned or mutilated condition,” and the transcript shall be as effectual and valid to all intents and purposes as the original record, except as is provided in §§ 10-7-116 and 10-7-118.

Acts 1877, ch. 83, § 2; Shan., § 3788; mod. Code 1932, § 7685; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-106.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus, § 12.

10-7-107. Omission of probate or acknowledgment.

When the register as transcriber finds any instrument on the original books registered without the probate or acknowledgment, the register shall leave, in the transcript made by the register, sufficient room to record the probate or acknowledgment of the instrument.

Code 1858, § 2101 (deriv. Acts 1806, ch. 40, § 1); Shan., § 3781; mod. Code 1932, § 7686; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-107.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus, § 12.

10-7-108. Entering omitted probate or acknowledgment in transcript where document in existence.

Any person having such a registered instrument in such person's possession may produce it to the register as transcriber while such person is transcribing, or to the register after the transcript is completed, and have the probate or acknowledgment entered of record.

Code 1858, § 2102 (deriv. Acts 1806, ch. 40, § 2); Shan., § 3782; mod. Code 1932, § 7687; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-108.

10-7-109. Copy of probate or acknowledgment made by clerk of court on demand.

Any person interested in having the probate or acknowledgment of an instrument registered may apply to the clerk of the court before which the probate was made, and, having first made oath that the original instrument is not in such person's possession, power, or control, demand and receive from such person a transcript of the probate or acknowledgment, duly certified by the clerk.

Code 1858, § 2103 (deriv. Acts 1806, ch. 40, § 3; 1807, ch. 62); Shan., § 3783; Code 1932, § 7688; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-109.

10-7-110. Entry in transcript book.

On producing such certificate, the register as transcriber shall insert the probate or acknowledgment and certificate at the foot of the deed on the register's record, just as if the original deed had been produced.

Code 1858, § 2104 (deriv. Acts 1806, ch. 40, § 3; 1807, ch. 62); Shan., § 3784; mod. Code 1932, § 7689; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-110.

10-7-111. [Reserved.]

The register shall properly index such transcript book or books.

Acts 1877, ch. 83, § 3; Shan., § 3789; Code 1932, § 7691; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-112.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus, § 12; 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, § 12.

10-7-113. Special deputies — Appointment by register necessitated.

The register of such county is authorized to appoint as many deputies as are necessary to ensure the completion of such transcripts at the earliest time practicable.

Acts 1877, ch. 83, § 4; Shan., § 3790; Code 1932, § 7692; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-113.

10-7-114. Register's fees.

For making such transcript, collation, and index, the register shall be entitled to one dollar ($1.00) per one hundred (100) words, to be paid by the county.

Acts 1877, ch. 83, § 4; Shan., § 3791; mod. Code 1932, § 7693; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-114; Acts 1987, ch. 80, § 1.

10-7-115. Original deposited in clerk's office.

The original records from which the transcript has been made shall be deposited in the clerk's office of the county.

Code 1858, § 2095 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 62, § 5); Shan., § 3775; Code 1932, § 7694; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-115.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus, § 12.

10-7-116. Copy made from original — Admissibility in evidence.

In case any person is dissatisfied with the transcript, and wishes to have access to the original, the clerk shall grant such person a transcript therefrom, but the same shall not be admitted as evidence unless it is found, upon examination, that the transcript in the register's office varies from the original record, so as to alter the meaning and substance thereof, in any deed or title which may be in litigation.

Code 1858, § 2098 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 62, §§ 5, 8); Shan., § 3778; Code 1932, § 7695; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-116.

10-7-117. [Reserved.]

Whenever the records, or any part of the records, of any of the counties are transcribed by order or authority of the county legislative body of such county, on account of the original records being mutilated, defaced, or for any other cause, a certified copy from such transcribed records shall be admissible as evidence in the several courts of this state, and shall have the same validity as if the certified copy was made from the original record, subject to § 10-7-116.

Acts 1879, ch. 115, § 1; Shan., § 3792; mod. Code 1932, § 7697; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-118.

Cross-References. Admissibility in evidence of copy made from original, § 10-7-116.

10-7-119. County legislative bodies authorized to have record books rebound.

Whenever any county legislative body of this state, on due examination as now required by law, shall ascertain that any of the books of record in the office of the register, county clerk, clerk and master, or circuit court clerk need to be rebound, in order to preserve and keep in proper condition for use such books, then the county legislative body of such a county may order and empower the chair of the court to take charge of such books of records, and execute a receipt for the same to the proper officer having custody of the books, and at once forward them to some good, competent, and reliable bookbinding firm or company in this state, and take a receipt from the firm or company for such books received by them, and require them to rebind the books and return them to such chair at as early a date as possible.

Acts 1897, ch. 73, § 1; Shan., § 3793a1; Code 1932, § 7699; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-119.

Cross-References. Register's books, county legislative body ordering to be rebound, § 10-7-105.

10-7-120. Liability of register and clerks suspended during rebinding.

During the time the record book or books are kept out of the office and custody of the county clerk, clerk and master, circuit court clerk, or register, for the purpose stated in § 10-7-119, such person shall be released and held harmless and free from all liability on such person's official bond or otherwise for the proper and safekeeping of such books in such person's office.

Acts 1897, ch. 73, § 2; Shan., § 3793a2; Code 1932, § 7700; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-120.

10-7-121. Government records kept on computer or removable computer storage media.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any information required to be kept as a record by any government official may be maintained on a computer or removable computer storage media, including in any appropriate electronic medium, instead of bound books or paper records if the following standards are met:

Such information is available for public inspection, unless it is a confidential record according to law;

Due care is taken to maintain any information that is a public record during the time required by law for retention;

All daily data generated and stored within the computer system shall be copied to computer storage media daily, and the newly created computer storage media more than one (1) week old shall be stored at a location other than at the building where the original is maintained; and

The official can provide a paper copy of the information when needed or when requested by a member of the public.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the government official to sell or provide the media upon which such information is stored or maintained.

In any county having a population of more than eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, all material that is maintained on a computer or removable computer storage media by the assessor of property that relates to information developed from the assessment of property or that is a record of the final assessment of property shall be made available to the public at cost within thirty (30) days of a request by a member of the public.

Acts 1993, ch. 315, § 10; 1994, ch. 643, § 1; 2014, ch. 648, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Legal standards governing municipal and state financial and personnel records, OAG 95-001, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 1 (1/6/95).

Duty of notary public to maintain record; use of electronic medium for record. OAG 14-89, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 94 (9/29/14).

10-7-122. [Reserved.]

Each county official may provide computer access and remote electronic access for inquiry only to information contained in the records of that office which are maintained on computer storage media in that office, during and after regular business hours. Such official may charge users of information provided through remote electronic access a reasonable amount sufficient to recover the costs of providing such services and for no other access services. Any such fee shall be uniformly applied. Any official providing remote electronic access to the records of that office shall implement procedures and utilize a system (equipment and software) that does not allow records of that office which may be viewed through remote electronic means to be altered, deleted or impaired in any manner. Any official providing such remote electronic access to any of the records of that office shall file a statement with the comptroller of the treasury at least thirty (30) days prior to offering such service, or if service is being offered, as of June 28, 1997, except those who have previously implemented such a system shall not be subject to these provisions. The statement shall describe the computer equipment, software and procedures used to provide remote electronic access and to ensure that this access will not allow a user to alter, delete or impair any record of the office. The cost of providing computer access or remote electronic access to local records shall not be borne by the state of Tennessee.

For the purposes of this section, a reasonable fee for providing access to the remote electronic access information system shall be an amount sufficient to recover the cost of actually providing such services and no more. When determining a reasonable fee for online access to review records, such fee and consideration shall not include the cost of storage and maintenance of the records, or the cost of the electronic record storage system.

Nothing in this section shall permit a fee to be charged for records that are viewed, electronic or otherwise, at the locations where they are maintained and stored.

Once a remote electronic access information system is in place, access must be given to all members of the public who desire access to such records, and pay applicable reasonable fees as defined in this section, including those who may use such information for proprietary purposes.

Nothing herein shall permit remote electronic access to records statutorily defined as confidential records.

This section shall supersede and replace any private acts which conflict with it.

Acts 1997, ch. 304, §§ 1-3.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Attorney General Opinions. Publication of criminal case dispositions on the internet, OAG 00-014, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 14 (1/26/00).

Publication of criminal court records on the internet, OAG 00-058, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 58 (3/31/00).

County register's office which makes all its public records available on the internet may remove records regarding military discharges from the internet while continuing to make other types of public documents available, OAG 02-133, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 141 (12/18/02).